Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB269.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. The provisions of KRS 241.060, 438.305, 438.306, 438.307,
438.308, 438.309, 438.310, 438.312, 438.313, 438.316, and 438.331 that were enacted in
2024 Ky. Acts ch. 111 are hereby suspended until April 15, 2026.
Section 2. This Act is retroactive to January 1, 2025.
Section 3. Whereas a decision by the Supreme Court of the United States on the
status of the Food and Drug Administration's denial of approval of flavored vaping
products is necessary before the Commonwealth imposes stricter regulations on
individuals and businesses in this state, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act
takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise
becoming a law.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/17/2025 6:45 PM Jacketed